Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.030

Charters superseded—Application—Ordinances—Districts outside city authorized, within city authorized for transportation and infrastructure purposes.

This and the following chapters relating to municipal local improvements shall supersede the provisions of the charter of any city of the first class.

They shall apply to all incorporated cities and towns, including unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters.

The council of each city and town shall pass such general ordinance or ordinances as may be necessary to carry out their provisions and thereafter all proceedings relating to local improvements shall be conducted in accordance with this and the following chapters relating to municipal local improvements and the ordinance or ordinances of such city or town.

Cities or towns may form local improvement districts or utility local improvement districts composed entirely or in part of unincorporated territory outside of such city or town's corporate limits in the manner provided in this chapter, or, upon approval of the legislative authority of an adjoining city or town, may form local improvement districts or utility local improvement districts for transportation and infrastructure purposes that are composed entirely or in part of territory within that adjoining city or town.

[ 2009 c 237 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 4; 1967 c 52 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.43.030. Prior: 1963 c 56 s 1; prior: (i) 1911 c 98 s 60; 1899 c 146 s 1; RRS s 9413. (ii) 1911 c 98 s 67; RRS s 9420. (iii) 1911 c 98 s 71; RRS s 9424.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 237: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 25, 2009]." [ 2009 c 237 s 2.]

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.